New Jersey, session 221, S4602.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section: Diesel-powered motor vehicle means the same as that term is defined in section 2 of P.L.1995, c.157 (C.39:8-60). Gross vehicle weight rating means the same as that term is defined in section 2 of P.L.1995, c.157 (C.39:8-60). Heavy-duty diesel truck means the same as that term is defined in section 2 of P.L.1995, c.157 (C.39:8-60). Off-site vehicle inspection means a vehicle inspection conducted at a location other than the private inspection facilitys licensed business address, which inspection is conducted in compliance with the rules and regulations adopted by the Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission. Private inspection facility means the same as that term is defined in section 3 of P.L.1995, c.112 (C.39:8-43). b.    Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, a private inspection facility shall be authorized to perform an off-site vehicle inspection of one or more vehicles, including, but not limited to, diesel-fueled trucks with a gross vehicle weight rating of 8,500 pounds or less, heavy-duty diesel trucks, and diesel-powered motor vehicles; however, a private inspection facility shall not be authorized to perform off-site vehicle inspections of a school bus or a motor vehicle with an elevated chassis height. c.     The Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission may adopt, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), rules and regulations as may be necessary to implement the provisions of this section. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.